src/numeral-sme-lex.txt
LEXICON GOLBMANJEALJATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#njealját#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#njealját#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#njealját#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#njealját#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#njealját#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#njealját#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#njealját#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#njealját#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#njealját#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#njealját#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#njealját#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#njealját#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#njealját#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GOLBMAVIDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#viđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#viđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#viđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#viđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#viđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#viđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#viđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#viđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđat#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#viđat#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#viđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#viđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#viđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#viđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#viđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#viđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#viđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#viđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#viđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#viđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#viđat#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#guđát#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđát#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđát#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#guđát#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđát#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#guđát#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđát#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#guđát#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#guđát#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#guđát#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđát#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#guđát#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom:%>#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#guđat#lohki%>n K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>#guđat#logi%>n K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc:%>#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđat#logi%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Gen:%>X4#guđat#logi»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot»# NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;            ! golmmagielat
 +Num+Sg+Gen+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ess+Attr:%>n#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com+Attr:%>X5jn#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Attr:%>X4#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Nom+Attr:%>#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Acc+Attr:%>#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc:%>X4#guđat#logi%>s K ;
 +Num+Sg+Loc+Use/Sub:%>X4#guđat#logi%>n K ; ! !SOUTH
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Sg+Ill:%>X4#guđat#lohká%>j K ;
 +Num+Sg+Com:%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill:%>#guđat#logi%>jde K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>X5jn#guđat#logi%>jn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com:%>#guđat#logi%>jgujn K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc:%>#guđat#logi%>jn K ; !Nickel 91 from here downwards
 +Num+Pl+Nom+Attr:%>X4t#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Loc+Attr:%>X5jn#guđat#lot%> K ;
 +Num+Pl+Nom:%>X4t#guđat#logi%>t K ;
 +Num+Pl+Acc:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Gen:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Ill+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Pl+Com+Attr:%>X5jd#guđat#logi%>X5jd K ;
 +Num+Ess:%>X4t#guđat#logi%>n K ;

LEXICON 11TO99F
golbmanjealjátlohkái:golbma GOLBMANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
golbmaviđátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAVIDATLOHKAI ;
golbmaguđátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
golbmaviđatlohkái:golbma GOLBMAVIDATLOHKAI ;
golbmaguđatlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
LEXICON 111TO119
golbmanjealjátlohkái:golbma GOLBMANJEALJATLOHKAI ;
golbmaviđátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAVIDATLOHKAI ;
golbmaguđátlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
golbmaviđatlohkái:golbma GOLBMAVIDATLOHKAI ;
golbmaguđatlohkái:golbma GOLBMAGUDATLOHKAI ;
